Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 9

Arkansas Entertainers Hall of Fame Board

13-9-101 — 13-9-105.
[Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Entertainers Hall of Fame Board, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 776, § 3, effective January 1, 2018. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

13-9-101. Acts 1985, No. 671, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-122; Acts 1987, No. 467, § 1; 1993, No. 703, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 87; 1997, No. 255, § 4; 2001, No. 1288, § 5; 2005, No. 2103, § 35.

13-9-103. Acts 1985, No. 671, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-124; Acts 1987, No. 467, § 3; 1997, No. 255, § 5.

13-9-104. Acts 1985, No. 671, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-125; Acts 1997, No. 255, § 6.

13-9-105. Acts 1985, No. 671, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-126.

Former §
13-9-102, concerning office space and staff, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 255, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 671, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-123; Acts 1987, No. 467, § 2.